Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.52, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in sections 299C.52 to 299C.565, the following terms have the meanings given them: (a) "Child" means any person under the age of 18 years or any person certified or known to be mentally incompetent. (b) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid from a human biological specimen. (c) "Endangered" means that a law enforcement official has received sufficient evidence that the missing person is at risk of physical injury or death. The following circumstances indicate that a missing person is at risk of physical injury or death: (1) the person is missing as a result of a confirmed abduction or under circumstances that indicate that the person's disappearance was not voluntary; (2) the person is missing under known dangerous circumstances; (3) the person is missing more than 30 days; (4) the person is under the age of 21 and at least one other factor in this paragraph is applicable; (5) there is evidence the person is in need of medical attention or prescription medication such that it will have a serious adverse effect on the person's health if the person does not receive the needed care or medication; (6) the person does not have a pattern of running away or disappearing; (7) the person is mentally impaired; (8)new text begin the person has dementia, a traumatic brain injury, Alzheimer's disease, or other cognitive impairments;new text end new text begin (9)new text end there is evidence that the person may have been abducted by a noncustodial parent; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end the person has been the subject of past threats or acts of violence; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end there is evidence the person is lost in the wilderness, backcountry, or outdoors where survival is precarious and immediate and effective investigation and search and rescue efforts are critical; or deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end any other factor that the law enforcement agency deems to indicate that the person may be at risk of physical injury or death, including a determination by another law enforcement agency that the person is missing and endangered. (d) "Missing" means the status of a person after a law enforcement agency that has received a report of a missing person has conducted a preliminary investigation and determined that the person cannot be located. (e) "NCIC" means National Crime Information Center.